Connecticut, session 2026, HB05488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
to study expanding services provided by the 2-1-1 Infoline program
operated by the United Way of Connecticut. Such study shall include,
but need not be limited to, state funding necessary to expand services of
the program.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two representatives of the United Way of Connecticut, appointed
by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(2) Two representatives of advocacy organizations who serve clients
who have benefited or may benefit from services provided by the 2-1-1
Infoline program, appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
LCO No. 2657 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5488
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) A representative appointed by the Senate and House chairpersons
of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to human services;
(8) A representative appointed by the Senate and House ranking
members of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to human services;
(9) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(10) The Commissioner of Housing, or the commissioner's designee;
and
(11) The Commissioner of Early Childhood, or the commissioner's
designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) or (8) of subsection (b) of this section may be a
member of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
LCO No. 2657 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5488
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies and human services, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
The report shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) state costs to
expand staff of the 2-1-1 Infoline program by twenty per cent, and (2)
strategies to reduce wait times for callers to the Infoline to five minutes
or less. The task force shall terminate on the date that it submits such
report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section